Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2409
Eligible applicants; performance review; commission; powers; use of grants; limitation.

(1) The coalition shall review periodically the performance of eligible applicants participating under the Commission Grant Program and the federal act to determine if substantial compliance criteria are being met. The commission shall establish criteria for defining substantial compliance.

(2) Grants received by an eligible applicant under the Commission Grant Program shall not be used to replace or supplant any funds currently being used to support existing programs for juveniles.

(3) Grants received under the Commission Grant Program shall not be used for capital construction or the lease or acquisition of facilities except as provided in subdivision (3)(c) of section 43-2404.02.

Laws 1990, LB 663, § 9;

Laws 1992, LB 447, § 11;

Laws 1997, LB 424, § 6;

Laws 2000, LB 1167, § 47;

Laws 2001, LB 640, § 11;

Laws 2018, LB670, § 12.